src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/ca.aff
# Pronoms personals prefixats
PFX Z Y 5
PFX Z   0      m'          .                # m'abillo
PFX Z   0      t'          .                # t'abillo
PFX Z   0      s'          .                # s'abilla
PFX Z   0      l'          .                # l'abillo
PFX Z   0      n'          .                # n'abillo

NOSUGGEST !
