src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/ca.dic
abancalava/AZ
abarrocava/AZ
abat s/PZ
abjurava/AZ
abonir /MNZ
abrasir /MNZ
abrinava/AZ
absol/CSZ
abstenies/Z
abstindran/Z
abstindr /Z
abstingueu/Z
abstingu ssim/Z
abstrec/Z
aburgesava/AZ
acampava/AZ
acaptava/AZ
acastellanava/AZ
accelerava/AZ
acidava/AZ
aclarir /MNZ
acollir /MZ
acompanyava/AZ
acontentava/AZ
acorreguem/CZ
acorregu reu/Z
acorrerem/Z
acorrer em/Z
acorrin/CZ
acostumava/AZ
acresqu s/QZ
acugulava/AZ
acurtava/AZ
adeien/Z
adiem/CZ
adigui/DZ
adigu ssiu/Z
adirien/Z
adjudicava/AZ
adollava/AZ
adoptava/AZ
adscrigu s/QZ
advenia/Z
adverbialitzava/AZ
advindr /Z
advinguessin/Z
advingu reu/Z
ad ieu/Z
afanava/AZ
afegir /MNZ
aferrissava/AZ
afiliava/AZ
afligir /MNZ
aforestava/AZ
afusellava/AZ
agarbuixava/AZ
agen ava/AZ
agomboiava/AZ
agrair /MNZ
agrumava/AZ
aguerrir /MNZ
aiguabat/CSZ
aixafinava/AZ
ajaur /TZ
ajocava/AZ
alabava/AZ
alcadufava/AZ
aletejava/AZ
aljubava/AZ
alleugerir /MNZ
allocava/AZ
alquilava/AZ
alumenava/AZ
al apremava/AZ
amansava/AZ
amarguejava/AZ
ama ava/AZ
americanitzava/AZ
amollava/AZ
amorrallava/AZ
amotinava/AZ
amunionava/AZ
anaren/Z
anau/CZ
anem/CZ
anguilejava/AZ
anir /TZ
anotava/AZ
anticipava/AZ
an s/Z
an /GVYZ
apamava/AZ
aparegu s/QZ
aparracava/AZ
apegava/AZ
apercebr /TZ
apetonava/AZ
apitrava/AZ
apletava/AZ
apomava/AZ
apostatava/AZ
aprehenia/OZ
aprofitava/AZ
aproximava/AZ
aquarterava/AZ
arbitrava/AZ
argentava/AZ
armejava/AZ
arponava/AZ
arranava/AZ
arra mava/AZ
arremangava/AZ
arrenglerava/AZ
arrimava/AZ
arronsava/AZ
arrugava/AZ
artigava/AZ
aspergir /MNZ
assagetava/AZ
assassinava/AZ
assenyalava/AZ
asseur /TZ
assoldava/AZ
assumir /MNZ
atallava/AZ
atarterava/AZ
atenien/Z
ateny s/PZ
atinc/Z
atindr s/Z
atinguessis/Z
atingu s/Z
atomitzava/AZ
atracallava/AZ
atra ava/AZ
atribolava/AZ
atuir /MNZ
auscultava/AZ
avalava/AZ
avenia/Z
aven em/Z
aviava/AZ
avindrem/Z
avindr em/Z
avingueu/Z
avingu ssim/Z
av /Z
edificava/AZ
eguinava/AZ
eixancava/AZ
eixaugava/AZ
eixirem/Z
eixir s/Z
eixobrir /MNZ
eix em/Z
ejectava/AZ
elevava/AZ
embabaiava/AZ
embalatjava/AZ
embalumava/AZ
embarcava/AZ
embarrellava/AZ
embassava/AZ
embessonava/AZ
emblanquir /MNZ
embolava/AZ
emborniava/AZ
embotava/AZ
embotxava/AZ
embretolir /MNZ
embrossava/AZ
embutllofava/AZ
emfasitzava/AZ
emmalurava/AZ
emmantava/AZ
emmascarava/AZ
emmetxava/AZ
emmorrallava/AZ
emmustigava/AZ
empallegava/AZ
empantanegava/AZ
emparava/AZ
empassolava/AZ
empatxonava/AZ
empegueir /MNZ
empenyorava/AZ
empescava/AZ
empiocava/AZ
emplastrava/AZ
empolainava/AZ
empomava/AZ
empostava/AZ
emprendr /TZ
empr n/CSZ
enaltir /MNZ
enasprir /MNZ
encabritava/AZ
encalaixonava/AZ
encalostrava/AZ
encanastrava/AZ
encaparrotava/AZ
encapullava/AZ
encarcerava/AZ
encartava/AZ
encaterinava/AZ
encendrava/AZ
encerava/AZ
encertava/AZ
encirava/AZ
enclavillava/AZ
encobertorava/AZ
encobreixo/Z
encobrim/CZ
encobriries/Z
encobriu/CZ
encobr ssiu/Z
encolerir /MNZ
enconxava/AZ
encorreguem/CZ
encorregu reu/Z
encorrerem/Z
encorrer em/Z
encorrin/CZ
encotonava/AZ
encrocava/AZ
encuirassava/AZ
endentava/AZ
endinsava/AZ
endomassava/AZ
enduem/Z
endugueu/Z
endugu ssim/Z
enduran/Z
endur /Z
end iem/Z
enfangava/AZ
enfastidir /MNZ
enferir /MNZ
enfilava/AZ
enfollir /MNZ
enforatava/AZ
enfoscava/AZ
enfrontava/AZ
enfugin/CZ
enfugiries/Z
enfugissis/Z
enfug ssim/Z
enfurrunyava/AZ
engalavernava/AZ
engaltava/AZ
engargallava/AZ
engatava/AZ
enginjolava/AZ
engolir /MNZ
engraellava/AZ
engreixinava/AZ
engrossir /MNZ
enguerxinava/AZ
enjoiellava/AZ
enlairava/AZ
enllaunava/AZ
enlletgir /MNZ
enllosava/AZ
ennavegava/AZ
enorgullava/AZ
enquistava/AZ
enrampava/AZ
enredava/AZ
enretirava/AZ
enriolava/AZ
enrolava/AZ
ensabava/AZ
ensalivava/AZ
enseguir /MNZ
enseuava/AZ
ensofronyava/AZ
ensostrava/AZ
ensutzava/AZ
entallava/AZ
enteixinava/AZ
entenia/OZ
entinava/AZ
entorcillava/AZ
entotsolava/AZ
entrebancava/AZ
entrecreuava/AZ
entrediem/Z
entredigui/DZ
entredigu ssiu/Z
entredir /Z
entred iem/Z
entrelligassava/AZ
entrelluus/Z
entremetia/OZ
entreobren/Z
entreobriran/Z
entreobrir /Z
entreobriu/CZ
entreobr ssim/Z
entreseguir /MNZ
entretzenava/AZ
entreveien/Z
entrevei /Z
entrevenien/Z
entreveres/Z
entreveuries/Z
entrevindran/Z
entrevindr /Z
entrevingueu/Z
entrevingu ssim/Z
entrev rem/Z
entroncava/AZ
enturava/AZ
envalentir /MNZ
enventava/AZ
envescava/AZ
enviduava/AZ
environava/AZ
enxampava/AZ
equidistava/AZ
equivalia/OZ
erigir /MNZ
errava/AZ
esbafegava/AZ
esbaltir /MNZ
esbarrejava/AZ
esbatussava/AZ
esblanqueir /MNZ
esbordellava/AZ
esbotifarrava/AZ
esbrocava/AZ
esbrotava/AZ
escabellava/AZ
escaguitxava/AZ
escaldufava/AZ
escamnava/AZ
escantellava/AZ
escapava/AZ
escardassava/AZ
escarpellava/AZ
escarrollava/AZ
escatava/AZ
escava/AZ
esclafir /MNZ
escocellava/AZ
escollava/AZ
esconillava/AZ
escorpitava/AZ
escorreguessin/Z
escorregu ssiu/Z
escorrerien/Z
escorreu/CZ
escorr em/Z
escotxinava/AZ
escrivia/OZ
escucava/AZ
esculpir /MNZ
esdentegava/AZ
esdevens/Z
esdevindrien/Z
esdevingueren/Z
esdevingu /Z
esfacelava/AZ
esflorava/AZ
esgaldinyava/AZ
esgarrinxava/AZ
esglevava/AZ
esgrassotava/AZ
esgrumollava/AZ
esllanguir /MNZ
esmaltava/AZ
esmerdissava/AZ
esmolava/AZ
esmortir /MNZ
espaiava/AZ
espaordir /MNZ
espasava/AZ
especiava/AZ
espelleringava/AZ
espellucava/AZ
espenyia/OZ
esperrucava/AZ
espiava/AZ
espingava/AZ
espipellejava/AZ
espitregava/AZ
espodassava/AZ
esponcellava/AZ
espotonava/AZ
espuava/AZ
esqueia/OZ
esquerava/AZ
esquilava/AZ
estabilitzava/AZ
estaiava/AZ
estampir /MNZ
estareu/Z
estar em/Z
estaven/Z
estereotipava/AZ
esterrossava/AZ
estigueres/Z
estigu rem/Z
estimava/AZ
estireganyava/AZ
estorava/AZ
estossinava/AZ
estrafacis/Z
estrafaries/Z
estrafeies/Z
estraf /Z
estraf ssiu/Z
estrenava/AZ
estricava/AZ
estronxava/AZ
estufir /MNZ
esvair /MNZ
esventrellava/AZ
eteritzava/AZ
evacuava/AZ
exacerbava/AZ
excardinava/AZ
exclour /TZ
excusava/AZ
exhalava/AZ
existimava/AZ
expectorava/AZ
expirava/AZ
expressava/AZ
exsudava/AZ
extractava/AZ
extraus/Z
extreguis/Z
hagi/DZ
hagu rem/Z
halava/AZ
haureu/Z
haur eu/Z
hav eu/Z
herboritzava/AZ
heus/Z
hipnotitzava/AZ
homogene tzava/AZ
hostejava/AZ
idealitzava/AZ
il lusionava/AZ
immigrava/AZ
impartir /MNZ
implementava/AZ
imprecava/AZ
imprimeixin/CZ
imprimien/Z
imprimiria/Z
imprimissin/Z
imprim s/Z
impulsava/AZ
incitava/AZ
incorporava/AZ
incorregu /Z
incorren/Z
incorrer s/Z
incorrien/Z
increpava/AZ
indemnitzava/AZ
indisposava/AZ
infamava/AZ
infibulava/AZ
infon/CSZ
infringir /MNZ
iniciava/AZ
insalivava/AZ
insinuava/AZ
instava/AZ
insubordinava/AZ
interaccionava/AZ
interdiem/Z
interdigui/DZ
interdigu ssiu/Z
interdir /Z
interd iem/Z
interpolava/AZ
intervenen/Z
interven eu/Z
intervindries/Z
intervingueres/Z
intervingu rem/Z
intimava/AZ
intubava/AZ
inventava/AZ
ireixer /TZ
irritava/AZ
isolava/AZ
ixin/CZ
objurgava/AZ
obren/Z
obriran/Z
obrir /Z
obriu/CZ
obr ssim/Z
obstava/AZ
obteniu/CZ
obtindria/Z
obtinguem/CZ
obtinguis/Z
obturava/AZ
obvens/Z
obvindria/Z
obvinguem/CZ
obvinguis/Z
obv /Z
ocorregueres/Z
ocorregu ssim/Z
ocorreria/Z
ocorres/Z
ocorro/Z
ofegava/AZ
ofereixin/CZ
oferien/Z
oferiria/Z
oferissin/Z
ofer reu/Z
oiava/AZ
ombrava/AZ
omples/Z
omplirem/Z
omplir s/Z
omplo/Z
ompl ssiu/Z
oposava/AZ
orbitava/AZ
orientava/AZ
oronejava/AZ
oscava/AZ
ovalava/AZ
serien/Z
ucava/AZ
ullprenia/OZ
unflava/AZ
universalitzava/AZ
usdefruitava/AZ
